Hawaii statutes.
§455-8 License to practice; biennial
registration; continuing education. (a) Licenses to practice naturopathic
medicine shall be issued by the board to those who qualify according to this
chapter. Naturopathic physicians licensed under this chapter shall observe and
be subject to all state requirements relative to reporting births and all
matters pertaining to the public health with equal rights and obligations as
physicians, surgeons, and practitioners of other schools of medicine. These
equal rights shall apply to all matters of public health, including the
performance of medical examinations and evaluations.

(b) Every licensee shall renew the licensee's
license on or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year. Failure to renew
the license on or before December 31 of each odd-numbered year shall
automatically constitute a forfeiture of the license; provided that the license
shall be restored upon written application therefor together with payment of
the renewal fee, all delinquent fees, a penalty fee, and, beginning with the
December 31, 2017, renewal, satisfactory proof of compliance with the
continuing education requirements set forth in this section.

(c) Beginning with the December 31, 2017,
renewal and prior to every biennial renewal thereafter, each licensee shall
complete at least thirty-five hours of continuing education courses within the
two-year period preceding the renewal date, including a minimum of fifteen
hours of continuing education courses in pharmacology within every licensing biennium.

(d) A licensee who graduated from a school,
university, or college of naturopathic medicine pursuant to section 455-3
within one year of the licensee's first renewal period shall not be subject to
the continuing education requirement for the first license renewal.

(e) Each licensee shall be responsible for
maintaining the licensee's continuing education records, including but not
limited to certificates of completion of the continuing education courses.

(f) Prior to December 31 of each odd-numbered
year, each licensee shall:

(1) Complete the renewal form prescribed by the board
and certify that the licensee has complied with the continuing education
requirement of this section for the applicable renewal period; and

(2) Submit evidence of completion of the continuing
education courses taken during the applicable renewal period to the board,
including but not limited to certificates of completion. At a minimum,
documentation shall contain the following information:

(A) Name of the licensee;

(B) Title of the continuing education course
taken;

(C) Date that the continuing education course
was taken;

(D) Name of the professional association or
organization that approved the continuing education course;

(E) Number of hours for the course; and

(F) Number of hours for the course in
pharmacology. [L 1925, c 77, pt of §1; RL 1935, §1303; am L 1937, c 221, §6; RL
1945, §2657; RL 1955, §66-8; am L 1957, c 316, §7; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19;
HRS §455-8; am L 1969, c 106, §4; am L 1975, c 118, §18; am L 1978, c 162, §4;
am L 1982, c 112, §5; am L 1984, c 7, §39; am L 1986, c 76, §12; am L 1990, c
77, §1; am L Sp 2009, c 22, §8; am L 2014, c 222, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next